Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 17.133, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Eligible farmer" means an individual who at the time that the grant is awarded: (1) is a resident of Minnesota who intends to acquire farmland located within the state and provide the majority of the day-to-day physical labor and management of the farm; (2) grosses no more than $250,000 per year from the sale of farm products; new text begin (3) has earned at least $1,000 in farm income or has evidence of farming experience; new text end new text begin (4) has a net worth that does not exceed the limit under section 41B.03, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2); new text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end has not, and whose spouse has not, at any time had a direct or indirect ownership interest in farmland; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end is not, and whose spouse is not, a family member of the owner of the farmland that the individual intends to acquire. "Family member" has the meaning given in section 267(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code. new text begin (c) "Evidence of farming experience" means that an individual has: new text end new text begin (1) completed an approved farm business management program; new text end new text begin (2) a four-year degree in an agriculture-related field; or new text end new text begin (3) at least three years of experience managing a comparable farm. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Farm down payment" means an initial, partial payment required by a lender or seller to purchase farmland. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Incubator farm" means a farm where: (1) individuals are given temporary, exclusive, and affordable access to small parcels of land, infrastructure, and often training, for the purpose of honing skills and launching a farm business; and (2) a majority of the individuals farming the small parcels of land grow industrial hemp, cannabis, or one or more of the following specialty crops as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture for purposes of the specialty crop block grant program: fruits and vegetables, tree nuts, dried fruits, medicinal plants, culinary herbs and spices, horticulture crops, floriculture crops, and nursery crops. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Limited land access" means farming without ownership of land and: (1) the individual or the individual's child rents or leases the land, with the term of each rental or lease agreement not exceeding three years in duration, from a person who is not related to the individual or the individual's spouse by blood or marriage; or (2) the individual rents the land from an incubator farm. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end "Limited market access" means the individual has gross sales of no more than $100,000 per year from the sale of farm products. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 17.133, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Grants. The commissioner may award farm down payment assistance grants of up to new text begin 30 percent of the purchase price of a farm, with a maximum grant of new text end $20,000 per eligible farmer. Each award must be matched with at least $8,000 of other funding. Grants under this subdivision may be awarded by a randomized selection process after applications are collected over a period of no less than 30 calendar days. An eligible farmer must commit to own and farm the land purchased with assistance provided under this section for at least five years. new text begin For the first five years, each recipient must verify gross farm income of at least $1,000 or demonstrate investment of at least $1,000 in farm business infrastructure, equipment, perennial crops, or livestock. new text end For each year that a grant recipient does not own and farm the land during the five-year period, the grant recipient must pay a penalty to the commissioner equal to 20 percent of the grant amount. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Laws 2025, chapter 34, article 1, section 2, subdivision 4, as amended by Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 11, section 12, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Administration and Financial Assistance 14,179,000 11,145,000 (a) $474,000 the first year and $474,000 the second year are for payments to county and district agricultural societies and associations under Minnesota Statutes, section 38.02, subdivision 1. Aid payments to county and district agricultural societies and associations must be disbursed no later than July 15 each year. These payments are the amount of aid from the state for an annual fair held in the previous calendar year. (b) $300,000 the first year and $300,000 the second year are for grants to the Minnesota Agricultural Education and Leadership Council for programs of the council under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 41D. The base for this appropriation is $250,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (c) $1,250,000 the first year deleted text begin and $1,250,000 the second year aredeleted text end new text begin isnew text end to award and administer farm down payment assistance grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.133, with priority given to eligible applicants with no more than $100,000 in annual gross farm product sales and eligible applicants who are producers of industrial hemp, cannabis, or one or more of the following specialty crops as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture for purposes of the specialty crop block grant program: fruits and vegetables, tree nuts, dried fruits, medicinal plants, culinary herbs and spices, horticulture crops, floriculture crops, and nursery crops. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of the first year does not cancel and is available in the second year deleted text begin and appropriations encumbered under contract by June 30, 2027, are availabledeleted text end new text begin and any unencumbered balance at the end of the second year does not cancel and is availablenew text end until June 30, 2029. deleted text begin The base for this appropriation is $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter.deleted text end (d) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for the purchase of milk for distribution to Minnesota's food shelves and other charitable organizations that are eligible to receive food from the food banks. Milk purchased with grant money must be acquired from Minnesota milk processors and based on low-cost bids. The milk must be allocated to each Feeding America food bank serving Minnesota according to the formula used in the distribution of United States Department of Agriculture commodities under The Emergency Food Assistance Program. The commissioner may enter into contracts or agreements with food banks for shared funding or reimbursement of the direct purchase of milk. Each food bank that receives funding under this paragraph may use up to two percent for administrative expenses. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance the first year does not cancel and is available the second year. (e) $260,000 the first year and $260,000 the second year are for a pass-through grant to Region Five Development Commission to provide, in collaboration with Farm Business Management, statewide mental health counseling support to Minnesota farm operators, families, and employees, and individuals who work with Minnesota farmers in a professional capacity. Region Five Development Commission may use up to 7.5 percent of the grant awarded under this paragraph for administration. (f) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are to expand the Emerging Farmers Office and provide services to beginning and emerging farmers to increase connections between farmers and market opportunities throughout the state. This appropriation may be used for grants, translation services, training programs, or other purposes in line with the recommendations of the emerging farmer working group established under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.055, subdivision 1. (g) $137,000 the first year and $203,000 the second year are to support current services. (h) $337,000 the first year and $337,000 the second year are for farm advocate services. Of these amounts, $50,000 the first year and $50,000 the second year are for the continuation of the farmland transition programs and may be used for grants to farmland access teams to provide technical assistance to potential beginning farmers. Farmland access teams must assist existing farmers and beginning farmers with transitioning farm ownership and farm operation. Services provided by teams may include but are not limited to mediation assistance, designing contracts, financial planning, tax preparation, estate planning, and housing assistance. (i) $3,000,000 the first year is for transfer to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to First District Association to acquire land for and to design, engineer, construct, equip, and furnish a wastewater treatment project. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 15, subdivision 7. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end $50,000 the first year is to be awarded as a grant in a competitive bid process to an entity that is not a for-profit entity to conduct a study of market and workforce factors that may contribute to the incorrect marking for the installation of underground telecommunications infrastructure that is located within ten feet of existing underground utilities or that crosses the existing underground utilities. The study must include recommendations to the legislature and be submitted to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance by June 1, 2027. deleted text begin (r)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end $50,000 the first year is to conduct a study and develop recommendations for establishing an incentive-based program to support and encourage agricultural retailers in promoting 4R nutrient management practices. The 4R nutrient management practices include: the right source of nutrients, at the right rate and right time, in the right place. (1) As part of the study, the department must evaluate strategies for leveraging cost-share programs, including the feasibility of coordinating with the Agricultural Water Quality Certification Program and other efforts related to the state's Nutrient Reduction Strategy. (2) The commissioner must submit a report detailing its findings, including potential funding sources and proposal outlines for funding requests where appropriate. The commissioner must submit the report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture and environment by March 15, 2026. new text begin (l) $1,250,000 the second year is to award and administer farm down payment assistance grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.133, with priority given to eligible applicants with annual gross farm product sales between $1,000 and $100,000. Of this appropriation, up to 50 percent may be awarded by lottery to priority applicants who possess a purchase agreement as of June 30, 2026. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of the second year does not cancel and is available until June 30, 2030. The base for this appropriation is $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end deleted text begin (s)deleted text end new text begin (m)new text end The commissioner shall continue to increase connections with ethnic minority and immigrant farmers to farming opportunities and farming programs throughout the state. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end